California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Upon receipt of a certified copy of the Labor Commissioner’s finding of a willful or deliberate violation of the Labor Code by a licensee, pursuant to Section 98.9 of the Labor Code, or upon transmission to the Contractors’ State License Board of copies of any citations or other actions taken by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 3420) of Group 3 of Subchapter 7 of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the Code of California Regulations, the registrar shall initiate disciplinary action against the licensee
 within 18 months from the date of the registrar’s receipt of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 128, Sec. 2.   (AB 2210)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7111.

(a) Failure to make and keep records showing all contracts, documents, records, receipts, and disbursements by a licensee of all of his or her transactions as a contractor, and failure to have those records available for inspection by the registrar or his or her duly authorized representative for a period of not less than five years after completion of any construction project or operation to which the records refer, or refusal by a licensee to comply with a written request of the registrar to make the records available for inspection constitutes a cause for disciplinary action. 

(b) Failure of a licensee, applicant, or registrant subject to the provisions of this chapter, who without lawful excuse, delays, obstructs, or refuses to comply with a written request of the registrar or designee for information or records, to provide that information or make available those records, when the information or records are required in the attempt to discharge any duty of the registrar, constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

7111.1.

The failure of, or refusal by, a licensee to respond to a written request of the registrar to cooperate in the investigation of a complaint against that licensee constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1174, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

7112.

Omission or misrepresentation of a material fact by an applicant or a licensee in obtaining, or renewing a license, or in adding a classification to an existing license constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7112.1.

Any classification that has been added to an existing license record as a result of an applicant or licensee omitting or misrepresenting a material fact shall be expunged from the license record pursuant to a final order of the registrar evidencing a violation of Section 7112.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7113.

Failure in a material respect on the part of a licensee to complete any construction project or operation for the price stated in the contract for such construction project or operation or in any modification of such contract constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7113.5.

The avoidance or settlement by a licensee for less than the full amount of the lawful obligations of the licensee incurred as a contractor, whether by (a) composition, arrangement, or reorganization with creditors under state law, (b) composition, arrangement, or reorganization with creditors under any agreement or understanding, (c) receivership as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing at Section 564) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, (d) assignment for the benefit of creditors, (e) trusteeship, or (f) dissolution, constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

This section shall not apply to an individual settlement of the
 obligation of a licensee by the licensee with a creditor that is not a part of or in connection with a settlement with other creditors of the licensee.

No disciplinary action shall be commenced against a licensee for discharge of or settling in bankruptcy under federal law, the licensee’s lawful obligations incurred as a contractor for less than the full amount of the obligations, so long as the licensee satisfies all of those lawful obligations, to the extent the obligations are not discharged under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7114.

(a) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this chapter or combining or conspiring with an unlicensed person, or allowing one’s license to be used by an unlicensed person, or acting as agent or partner or associate, or otherwise, of an unlicensed person with the intent to evade the provisions of this chapter constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(b) A licensee who is found by the registrar to have violated subdivision (a) shall, in accordance with the provisions of this article, be subject to the registrar’s authority to order payment of a specified sum to an injured party, including, but not limited to, payment for
 any injury resulting from the acts of the unlicensed
 person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 319, Sec. 8.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7114.1.

Any licensee whose signature appears on a falsified certificate in support of an examinee’s experience qualifications, or otherwise certifying to false or misleading experience claims by an applicant, which have been submitted to obtain a contractor’s license shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 891, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

7114.2.

Any licensed or unlicensed person who commits any act prohibited by Section 119 is subject to the administrative remedies authorized by this chapter. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other available remedies, whether civil or criminal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 163, Sec. 1.   (SB 261)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7115.

Failure in any material respect to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, or to comply with the provisions of Section 7106 of the Public Contract Code, constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

7116.

The doing of any wilful or fraudulent act by the licensee as a contractor in consequence of which another is substantially injured constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7116.5.

It is a cause for discipline for a licensee to do any of the following:

(a) Engage in any conduct that subverts or attempts to subvert an investigation of the board.

(b) Threaten or harass any person or licensee for providing evidence in any possible or actual disciplinary action, arbitration, or other legal action.

(c) Discharge an employee primarily because of the employee’s attempt to comply with or aid in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7117.

Acting in the capacity of a contractor under any license issued hereunder except: (a) in the name of the licensee as set forth upon the license, or (b) in accordance with the personnel of the licensee as set forth in the application for such license, or as later changed as provided in this chapter, constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7117.5.

(a) Acting in the capacity of a contractor under any license which has been made inactive, as provided in Section 7076.5, constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(b) Acting in the capacity of a contractor under any license that has been suspended for any reason constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(c) Acting in the capacity of a contractor under any license that has expired constitutes a cause for disciplinary action if the license is subject to renewal pursuant to Section 7141. The actions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other remedies either civil or criminal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 467, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7117.6.

Acting in the capacity of a contractor in a classification other than that currently held by the licensee constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 891, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

7118.

Entering into a contract with a contractor while such contractor is not licensed as provided in this chapter constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

7118.4.

(a) If a contractor has made an inspection for the purpose of determining the presence of asbestos or the need for related remedial action with knowledge that the report has been required by a person as a condition of making a loan of money secured by the property, or is required by a public entity as a condition of issuing a permit concerning the property, the contractor shall disclose orally and in writing if it is owned or has any common ownership, or any financial relationship whatsoever, including, but not limited to, commissions or referral fees, with an entity in the business of performing the corrective work.

(b) This section does not prohibit a contractor that has contracted to perform corrective work after the report of another company has indicated the presence of asbestos or the need for related remedial action from making its own inspection prior to performing that corrective work or from making an inspection to determine whether the corrective measures were successful and, if not, thereafter peforming additional corrective work.

(c) A violation of this section is grounds for disciplinary action.

(d) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both.

(e) For the purpose of this section, “asbestos” has the meaning set forth in Section 6501.7 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1491, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7118.5.

Any contractor, applicant for licensure, or person required to be licensed, who, either knowingly or negligently, or by reason of a failure to inquire, enters into a contract with another person who is required to be, and is not, certified pursuant to Section 7058.5 to engage in asbestos-related work, as defined in Section 6501.8 of the Labor Code, is subject to the following penalties:

(a) Conviction of a first offense is an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), and by possible revocation or suspension of any contractor’s license. 

(b) Conviction of a subsequent offense is a misdemeanor requiring revocation or suspension of any contractor’s license, and a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

7118.6.

Any contractor who, either knowingly or negligently, or by reason of a failure to inquire, enters into a contract with another person who is required to be, and is not certified pursuant to Section 7058.7 to engage in a removal or remedial action, as defined in Section 7058.7, is subject to the following penalties:

(a) Conviction of a first offense is an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), and by possible revocation or suspension of any contractor’s license. 

(b) Conviction of a subsequent offense is a misdemeanor requiring revocation or suspension of any contractor’s license, and a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7119.

Wilful failure or refusal without legal excuse on the part of a licensee as a contractor to prosecute a construction project or operation with reasonable diligence causing material injury to another constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7120.

Wilful or deliberate failure by any licensee or agent or officer thereof, to pay any moneys, when due for any materials or services rendered in connection with his operations as a contractor, when he has the capacity to pay or when he has received sufficient funds therefor as payment for the particular construction work, project, or operation for which the services or materials were rendered or purchased constitutes a cause for disciplinary action, as does the false denial of any such amount due or the validity of the claim thereof with intent to secure for himself, his employer, or other person, any discount upon such indebtedness or with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud the person to whom such indebtedness is due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.

A person who has been denied a license for a reason other than failure to document sufficient satisfactory experience for a supplemental classification for an existing license, or who has had his or her license revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew his or her license while it was under suspension, or who has been a partner, officer, director, manager, or associate of any partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association whose application for a license has been denied for a reason other than failure to document sufficient satisfactory experience for a supplemental classification for an existing license, or whose license has been revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew a license
 while it was under suspension, and while acting as a partner, officer, director, manager, or associate had knowledge of or participated in any of the prohibited acts for which the license was denied, suspended, or revoked, shall be prohibited from serving as an officer, director, associate, partner, manager, qualifying individual, or member of the personnel of record of a licensee, and the employment, election, or association of this type of person by a licensee in any capacity other than as a nonsupervising bona fide employee shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 28.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the disassociation of a partner, officer, director, manager, or associate from the license of a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association whose license has been cited pursuant to Section 7099 shall not relieve the partner, officer, director, manager, or associate from responsibility for complying with the citation if he or she had knowledge of, or participated in, any of the prohibited acts for which the citation was issued. Section 7121 shall apply to a partner, officer, director, manager, or associate of a licensee that fails to comply with a citation after it is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 29.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.5.

A person who was the qualifying individual on a revoked license, or of a license under suspension, or of a license that was not renewed while it was under suspension, shall be prohibited from serving as an officer, director, associate, partner, manager, or qualifying individual of a licensee, whether or not the individual had knowledge of or participated in the prohibited acts or omissions for which the license was revoked, or suspended, and the employment, election, or association of that person by a licensee shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 30.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.6.

(a) An individual who meets all of the following criteria shall not perform any act regulated under this chapter for or on behalf of a licensee, other than as a bona fide nonsupervising employee:

(1) The individual was listed as an officer, director, owner, manager, partner, or associate of a license that was revoked.

(2) The individual had knowledge of or participated in any act or omission for which the license was revoked.

(3) The individual is not eligible for reinstatement for licensure under Section 7102.

(b) An individual who meets all of the following criteria shall not perform any act regulated under this chapter for or on behalf of a licensee, other than as a bona fide nonsupervising employee:

(1) The individual furnished the qualifications for licensure, as set forth under Section 7068, and that license was revoked.

(2) The individual served in the capacity of the qualifying individual during the commission or omission of any of the acts that resulted in the revocation of the license, whether or not he or she had knowledge of or participated in those acts.

(3) The individual is not eligible for reinstatement for licensure under Section 7102.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor
 punishable by a fine of not less than four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500), by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment. The penalty provided by this subdivision is cumulative to the penalties available under other laws of this state.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an indictment for any violation of this section shall be found or an information or complaint filed within four years from the performance of any act that is prohibited under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 31.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.65.

Prior to becoming employed in any capacity by an entity that is subject to licensure under this chapter, an individual who is described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 7121.6 shall provide the prospective employer with written notice of the license revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 171, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.7.

(a) A qualifying individual, officer, partner, or other person named on a license shall not knowingly employ an individual who is described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 7121.6, except as a bona fide nonsupervising employee.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500), by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an indictment for any violation of this section shall be found or an information or complaint filed within four years from the performance of any act that is prohibited under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 171, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.8.

For purposes of this article, “bona fide nonsupervising employee” means a person who is exempt from the provisions of this chapter under Section 7053, and who does not otherwise meet the test of an independent contractor, as set forth under Section 2750.5 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 171, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7122.

The performance by an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association of an act or omission constituting a cause for disciplinary action, likewise constitutes a cause for disciplinary action against a licensee other than the individual qualifying on behalf of the individual or entity, if the licensee was a partner, officer, director, manager, or associate of that individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association at the time the act or omission occurred, and had knowledge of or participated in the prohibited act or omission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 32.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7122.1.

Notwithstanding Section 7068.2 or any other provision of this chapter, the disassociation of a qualifying individual from a license after the act or omission has occurred that resulted in a citation pursuant to Section 7099 shall not relieve the qualifying individual from responsibility for complying with the citation. Section 7122.5 shall apply to a qualifying individual of a licensee that fails to comply with a citation after it is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 33.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7122.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7068.2 or any other provisions of this chapter, the disassociation of a qualifying individual from a license that has been referred to arbitration pursuant to Section 7085 shall not relieve the qualifying individual from the responsibility of complying with an arbitration award rendered as a result of acts or omissions committed while acting as the qualifying individual for the license as provided under Sections 7068 and 7068.1.

(b) Section 7122.5 shall apply to a qualifying individual of a licensee that fails to comply with an arbitration award once it is rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 34.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7122.5.

The performance by an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association of an act or omission constituting a cause for disciplinary action, likewise constitutes a cause for disciplinary action against a licensee who at the time that the act or omission occurred was the qualifying individual of that individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association, whether or not he or she had knowledge of or participated in the prohibited act or omission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 35.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7123.

A conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a contractor constitutes a cause for disciplinary action. The record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

7123.5.

If a contractor is convicted of violating Section 396 of the Penal Code or any substantially similar local ordinance in connection with the sale, or offer for sale, of repair or reconstruction services, as defined in Section 396 of the Penal Code, the Contractors State License Board shall take disciplinary action against the contractor, which shall include a suspension of at least six months or the permanent revocation of the contractor’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 63.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7124.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1532.)
-------------------------------------------

7124.6.

(a) The registrar shall make available to members of the public the date, nature, and status of all complaints on file against a licensee that do either of the following:

(1) Have been referred for accusation.

(2) Have been referred for investigation after a determination by board enforcement staff that a probable violation has occurred, and have been reviewed by a supervisor, and regard allegations that if proven would present a risk of harm to the public and would be appropriate for suspension or revocation of the contractor’s license or criminal prosecution.

(b) The board shall create a disclaimer that shall accompany the disclosure of a complaint that shall state that the complaint is an allegation. The disclaimer may also contain any other information the board determines would be relevant to a person evaluating the complaint.

(c) (1) A complaint resolved in favor of the contractor shall not be subject to disclosure.

(2) A complaint resolved by issuance of a letter of admonishment pursuant to Section 7099.9 shall not be deemed resolved in favor of the contractor for the purposes of this section. A letter of admonishment issued to a licensee shall be disclosed for a period of either one year or two years
 from the date of service described in subdivision (c) of Section 7099.9. For the limited purposes of this paragraph, the determination regarding the one- or two-year disclosure shall be made based on the factors enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 7099.2.

(d) Except as described in subdivision (e), the registrar shall make available to members of the public the date, nature, and disposition of all legal actions.

(e) Disclosure of legal actions shall be limited as follows:

(1) (A) Citations shall be disclosed from the date of issuance and for five years after the date of compliance if no additional disciplinary
 actions have been filed against the licensee during the five-year period. If additional disciplinary actions were filed against the licensee during the five-year period, all disciplinary actions shall be disclosed for as long as the most recent disciplinary action is subject to disclosure under this section. At the end of the specified time period, those citations shall no longer be disclosed.

(B) Any disclosure pursuant to this paragraph shall also appear on the license record of any other license that includes a qualifier that is listed as one of the members of personnel of record of the license that was issued the citation.

(C) The disclosure described in subparagraph (B) shall be for the period of disclosure of the citation.

(2) Accusations that result in suspension, stayed suspension, or stayed revocation of the contractor’s license shall be disclosed from the date the accusation is filed and for seven years after the accusation has been settled, including the terms and conditions of probation if no additional disciplinary actions have been filed against the licensee during the seven-year period. If additional disciplinary actions were filed against the licensee during the seven-year period, all disciplinary actions shall be posted for as long as the most recent disciplinary action is subject to disclosure under this section. At the end of the specified time period, those accusations shall no longer be disclosed.

(3) All revocations that are not stayed shall be disclosed indefinitely from the effective date of the
 revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   (AB 2916)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Workers’ Compensation Insurance Reports [7125. - 7127.]

7125.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board shall require as a condition precedent to the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, renewal, or continued maintenance of a license, that the applicant or licensee have on file at all times a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance in the applicant’s or licensee’s business name. A Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance shall be issued and filed, electronically or otherwise, by an insurer duly licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance in this state. A Certification of Self-Insurance shall be issued and filed by the Director of Industrial Relations. If reciprocity conditions exist, as provided in Section 3600.5 of the Labor Code, the registrar shall require the information deemed necessary to ensure
 compliance with this section.

(b) This section does not apply to an applicant or licensee who meets both of the following conditions:

(1) Has no employees provided that the applicant or licensee files a statement with the board on a form prescribed by the registrar before the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, or continued maintenance of a license, certifying that the applicant or licensee does not employ any person in any manner so as to become subject to the workers’ compensation laws of California or is not otherwise required to provide for workers’ compensation insurance coverage under California law.

(2) Does not hold a C-8 license, as defined in Section 832.08 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, a C-20 license, as defined in Section 832.20 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, a
 C-22 license, as defined in Section 832.22 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, a C-39 license, as defined in Section 832.39 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, or a D-49 license, a subcategory of a C-61 license, as defined in Section 832.61 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) This section does not apply to an applicant or licensee organized as a joint venture pursuant to Section 7029 that has no employees, provided that the applicant or licensee files the statement prescribed by subparagraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) A Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance, Certification of Self-Insurance, or exemption certificate is not required of a holder of a license that has been inactivated on the official records of the board during the period the license is inactive.

(e) (1) The insurer, including the State Compensation Insurance Fund, shall report to the registrar the following information for any policy required under this section: name, license number, policy number, dates that coverage is scheduled to commence and lapse, and cancellation date if applicable.

(2) A workers’ compensation insurer shall also report to the registrar a licensee whose workers’ compensation insurance policy is canceled by the insurer if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The insurer has completed a premium audit or investigation.

(B) A material misrepresentation has been made by the insured that results in financial harm to the insurer.

(C) No reimbursement has been paid by the insured to the
 insurer.

(3) Willful or deliberate disregard and violation of workers’ compensation insurance laws constitutes a cause for disciplinary action by the registrar against the licensee.

(f) (1) For any license that, on January 1, 2013, is active and includes a C-39 classification in addition to any other classification, the registrar shall, in lieu of the automatic license suspension otherwise required under this article, remove the C-39 classification from the license unless a valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance is received by the registrar.

(2) For any licensee whose license, after January 1, 2013, is active and has had the C-39 classification removed as provided in paragraph (1), and who is found by the registrar to have employees and to lack a
 valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance, that license shall be automatically suspended as required under this article.

(g) (1) For any licensee whose license, after July 1, 2023, is active and includes a C-8, C-20, C-22, or D-49 classification, in addition to any other classification, the registrar shall, in lieu of the automatic license suspension otherwise required under this article, remove the C-8, C-20, C-22, or D-49 classification from the license unless a valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance is received by the registrar.

(2) For any licensee whose license, after July 1, 2023, is active and has had the C-8, C-20, C-22, or D-49 classification removed, as provided in paragraph (1), and who is found by the registrar to have employees and to lack a valid
 Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance, that license shall be automatically suspended as required under this article.

(h) The information reported pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) shall be confidential, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 978, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 12.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 13 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 485.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board shall require as a condition precedent to the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, renewal, or continued maintenance of a license, that the applicant or licensee have on file at all times a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance in the applicant’s or licensee’s business name. A Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance shall be issued and filed, electronically or otherwise, by an insurer duly licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance in this state. A Certification of Self-Insurance shall be issued and filed by the Director of Industrial Relations. If reciprocity conditions exist, as provided in Section 3600.5 of the Labor Code, the registrar shall require the information deemed necessary to ensure
 compliance with this section.

(b) This section does not apply to an applicant or licensee organized as a joint venture pursuant to Section 7029 that has no employees, provided that the applicant or licensee files a statement with the board on a form prescribed by the registrar before the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, or continued maintenance of a license, certifying that the applicant or licensee does not employ any person in any manner so as to become subject to the workers’ compensation laws of California or is not otherwise required to provide for workers’ compensation insurance coverage under California law.

(c) A Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance is not required of a holder of a license that has been inactivated on the official records of the board during the period the license is inactive.

(d) (1) The insurer, including the State Compensation Insurance Fund, shall report to the registrar the following information for any policy required under this section: name, license number, policy number, dates that coverage is scheduled to commence and lapse, and cancellation date if applicable.

(2) A workers’ compensation insurer shall also report to the registrar a licensee whose workers’ compensation insurance policy is canceled by the insurer if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The insurer has completed a premium audit or investigation.

(B) A material misrepresentation has been made by the insured that results in financial harm to the insurer.

(C) Reimbursement has not been paid by the insured to the insurer.

(3) Willful or deliberate disregard and violation of workers’ compensation insurance laws constitutes a cause for disciplinary action by the registrar against the licensee.

(e) The information reported pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) shall be confidential, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 978, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 13.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.1.

(a) The registrar shall accept a certificate required by Section 7125 as of the effective date shown on the certificate, if the certificate is received by the registrar within 90 days after that date, and shall reinstate the license to which the certificate pertains, if otherwise eligible, retroactive to the effective date of the certificate.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the registrar shall accept the certificate as of the effective date shown on the certificate, even if the certificate is not received by the registrar within 90 days after that date, upon a showing by the licensee, on a form acceptable to the registrar, that the failure to have a certificate on file was due to circumstances beyond the control of the licensee. The registrar shall reinstate the license to which the certificate pertains, if otherwise eligible, retroactive to the effective date of the certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 467, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.2.

The failure of a licensee to obtain or maintain workers’ compensation insurance coverage, if required under this chapter, shall result in the automatic suspension of the license by operation of law in accordance with the provisions of this section, but this suspension shall not affect, alter, or limit the status of the licensee as an employer for purposes of Section 3716 of the Labor Code.

(a) The license suspension imposed by this section is effective upon the earlier of either of the following:

(1) On the date that the relevant workers’ compensation insurance coverage lapses.

(2) On the date that workers’ compensation coverage is required to be obtained.

(b) A licensee who is subject to suspension under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be provided a notice by the registrar that includes all of the following:

(1) The reason for the license suspension and the effective date.
